Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-238
Automatic dialing-announcing device, defined.

Automatic dialing-announcing device means a device which selects and dials telephone numbers and automatically plays a recorded message.

Laws 1993, LB 305, § 2;

R.S.1943, (1999), § 86-1202;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 100.